Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,128
Peer review committee; health practitioners; immunity from liability; when.

No member of a peer review committee of a state or local association or society composed of persons credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall be liable in damages to any person for slander, libel, defamation of character, breach of any privileged communication, or otherwise for any action taken or recommendation made within the scope of the functions of such committee, if such committee member acts without malice and in the reasonable belief that such action or recommendation is warranted by the facts known to such member after a reasonable effort is made to obtain the facts on which such action is taken or recommendation is made.

Laws 1976, LB 586, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-147.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 128.